Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,202
Deposit with State Treasurer.

(MBCA 14.40) Assets of a
dissolved corporation that should be transferred to a creditor, claimant,
or shareholder of the corporation who cannot be found or who is not competent
to receive them shall be reduced to cash and deposited with the State Treasurer
in accordance with the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act. When
the creditor, claimant, or shareholder furnishes satisfactory proof of entitlement
to the amount deposited, the State Treasurer shall pay such person or his
or her representative that amount in accordance with the act.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 202.

Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act, see section 69-1329.